Arkansas, session 2025, HB1868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 88, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add a new section to read as follows:
23-88-107. Service fee for firefighting services — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "time on scene" means the documented time
spent by a fire department at the scene of a structure fire, accident, or
motor vehicle fire in response to an emergency call from the moment of
arrival at the scene of the structure fire, accident, or motor vehicle fire
until the documented time the scene is cleared by the fire department.
(b) If a fire department responds to a fire occurring within its
district and the property that is the subject of the alarm is insured in case
of any damage resulting from a fire, the insurance company insuring the
property against loss shall pay a fair and reasonable service fee directly to
the fire department for its firefighting services based on the time on scene
of the fire department.
*ANS434*
03/20/2025 8:47:49 AM ANS434